North Carolina, session 2025, SB188.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the sum of four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) in recurring funds for each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide financial support to North Carolina for Military
Employment (NC4ME) for workforce development and veteran employment initiatives. NC4ME
shall use these funds to support its programs, including:
(1) Employer engagement and training to hire military talent.
(2) Job fairs and hiring events tailored to transitioning service members and
veterans.
(3) Outreach and support services for military spouses seeking employment.
SECTION 2. By October 1 of each year, North Carolina for Military Employment
shall report to the Department of Commerce and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
General Government on the following:
(1) A detailed account of how funds were utilized.
(2) Metrics on the number of veterans, transitioning service members, and
spouses served.
(3) Outcomes related to employment placements and employer partnerships.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S188-v-1*